Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7390.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-16-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-16 entitled "Teachers’
Retirement [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-16-12. Procedure for service retirement.
Retirement of a member on a service retirement allowance shall be made by the retirement
board as follows:
(a)(i) Any member may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board
as of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed, provided the member
was separated from service prior to filing the application, and further provided however, that if
separation from service occurs during the month in which the application is filed, the effective date
shall be the first day following the separation from service, and provided further that the member
on retirement date has attained the age of sixty (60) years and has completed at least ten (10) years
of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, or regardless of age has completed twenty-eight
(28) years of total service and has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or
before July 1, 2005, and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September
30, 2009.
(ii) For teachers who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to July
1, 2012, benefits are available to teachers who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and
completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For teachers in service as of October 1,

2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but became eligible to retire prior
to July 1, 2012, the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62) will be adjusted downward in
proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The
proportional formula shall work as follows:
(A) The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in
effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of
sixty-two (62).
(B) The formula shall then take the teacher’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009,
as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (A) as the denominator.
(C) The fraction determined in (B) shall then be multiplied by the age difference in (1) to
apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).
(b)(i) Any member, who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service
on or before July 1, 2005, may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board as
of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed; provided, the member was
separated from service prior thereto; and further provided, however, that if separation from service
occurs during the month in which application is filed, the effective date shall be the first day
following that separation from service; provided, the member on his or her retirement date had
attained the age of fifty-nine (59) and had completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service;
or provided, that the member on his or her retirement date had attained the age of sixty-five (65)
and had completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service; or provided, that the member on
his or her retirement date had attained the age of fifty-five (55) and had completed twenty (20)
years of total service and provided, that the retirement allowance, as determined according to the
formula in § 16-16-13 is reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is less than
sixty-five (65) years and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September
30, 2009.
(ii) For teachers who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to July
1, 2012, benefits are available to teachers who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and have
completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service or have attained the age of sixty-five (65)
and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For teachers in service as of October
1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but become eligible to retire prior
to July 1, 2012, who have a minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62), the retirement age will be
adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September
30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:
(A) The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in
LC003366 - Page 2 of 15

effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of
sixty-two (62).
(B) The formula shall then take the teacher’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009,
as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (A) as the denominator.
(C) The fraction determined in (B) shall then be multiplied by the age difference
determined in (A) to apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).
(c) Effective July 1, 2012, the following shall apply to all teachers not eligible to retire
prior to July 1, 2012:
(i) A teacher with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, shall be eligible to retire
upon the completion of at least five (5) years of contributory service and attainment of the teacher’s
Social Security retirement age.
(ii) For teachers with five (5) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012,
with contributory service on and after July 1, 2012, who have a retirement age of Social Security
Retirement Age, the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of
service the teacher has earned as of June 30, 2012, but in no event shall a teacher’s retirement age
under this subparagraph (ii) be prior to the attainment of age fifty-nine (59) or prior to the teacher’s
retirement age determined under the laws in effect on June 30, 2012. The proportional formula shall
work as follows:
(1) The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in
effect on June 30, 2012, which shall then be subtracted from Social Security retirement age;
(2) The formula shall then take the teacher’s total service credit as of June 30, 2012, as the
numerator and the projected service at retirement age in effect on June 30, 2012, as the
denominator;
(3) The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined
in (1) to apply a reduction in years from Social Security retirement age.
(iii) Effective July 1, 2015, a teacher who has completed twenty (20) or more years of total
service and who has attained an age within five (5) years of the eligible retirement age under
subdivisions (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below, may elect to retire provided that the
retirement allowance shall be reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the teacher is less
than the eligible retirement age under subdivisions (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below in
accordance with the following table:
Year Preceding Retirement Cumulative Annual Reduction Cumulative Monthly
Reduction
For Year 1 9% .75%
LC003366 - Page 3 of 15

For Year 2 8% .667%
For Year 3 7% .583%
For Year 4 7% .583%
For Year 5 7% .583%
(iv) Notwithstanding any other provisions of section § 16-16-12(c), a teacher who has
completed ten (10) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012, may elect to retire at
his or her eligible retirement date as determined under subsections (a) and (b) above provided that
a teacher making an election under this paragraph shall receive the teacher’s retirement benefit
determined and calculated based on the teacher’s service and average compensation as of June 30,
2012. This provision shall be interpreted and administered in a manner to protect a teacher’s
accrued benefit on June 30, 2012.
(d)(i) Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (c) above, effective July 1, 2015,
teachers in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the earlier of:
(A) The attainment of at least age sixty-five (65) and the completion of at least thirty (30)
years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-four (64) and the completion of at least
thirty-one (31) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-three (63) and the
completion of at least thirty-two (32) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-
two (62) and the completion of at least thirty-three (33) years of total service; or
(B) The teacher’s retirement eligibility date under subsections (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (c) or subsection (d)(i) of this
section, commencing July 1, 2026, teachers in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the
earlier of:
(A) The attainment of at least age sixty (60) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years
of total service; or
(B) The teacher's retirement eligibility date under subsections (c)(i) or (c)(ii) of this section.
(e) Except as specifically provided in §§ 36-10-9.1, 36-10-12 through 36-10-15, and 45-
21-19 through 45-21-22, no member shall be eligible for pension benefits under this chapter unless
(i) The member shall have been a contributing member of the employees’ retirement
system for at least ten (10) years; or
(ii) For teachers in active contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, the teacher shall
have been a contributing member of the employees’ retirement system for at least five (5) years.
(2) Provided, however, a person who has ten (10) years service credit shall be vested;
provided that for teachers in active contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, a teacher who has
five (5) years of contributory service shall be vested.
LC003366 - Page 4 of 15

(3) Furthermore, any past service credits purchased in accordance with § 36-9-38 shall be
counted towards vesting.
(4) Any person who becomes a member of the employees’ retirement system pursuant to
§ 45-21-8 shall be considered a contributing member for the purpose of chapter 21 of title 45 and
this chapter.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no more than five (5) years of service
credit may be purchased by a member of the system. The five (5) year limit shall not apply to any
purchases made prior to January 1, 1995. A member who has purchased more than five (5) years
of service credit before January 1, 1995, shall be permitted to apply the purchases towards the
member’s service retirement. However, no further purchase will be permitted.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, effective July 1, 2012, except for purchases
under §§ 16-16-7.1, 36-5-3, 36-9-31, 36-10-10.4, and 45-21-53:
(i) For service purchases for time periods prior to a teacher’s initial date of hire, the
purchase must be made within three (3) years of the teacher’s initial date of hire; and
(ii) For service purchases for time periods for official periods of leave as authorized by
law, the purchase must be made within three (3) years of the time the official leave was concluded
by the teacher. Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) and (ii) above, service purchases from time periods
prior to June 30, 2012, may be made on or prior to June 30, 2015.
(f) No member of the teachers’ retirement system shall be permitted to purchase service
credits for casual or seasonal employment, for employment as a temporary or emergency employee,
a page in the general assembly, or for employment at any state college or university while the
employee is a student or graduate of the college or university.
(g) Except as specifically provided in §§ 16-16-6.2 and 16-16-6.4, a member shall not
receive service credit in this retirement system for any year or portion of a year which counts as
service credit in any other retirement system in which the member is vested or from which the
member is receiving a pension and/or any annual payment for life. This subsection shall not apply
to any payments received pursuant to the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.
(h) A member who seeks to purchase or receive service credit in this retirement system
shall have the affirmative duty to disclose to the retirement board whether or not he or she is a
vested member in any other retirement system and/or is receiving a pension, retirement allowance,
or any annual payment for life. The retirement board shall have the right to investigate as to whether
or not the member has utilized the same time of service for credit in any other retirement system.
The member has an affirmative duty to cooperate with the retirement board including, by way of
illustration and not by way of limitation, the duty to furnish or have furnished to the retirement
LC003366 - Page 5 of 15

board any relevant information that is protected by any privacy act.
(i) A member who fails to cooperate with the retirement board shall not have the time of
service credit counted toward total service credit until the time the member cooperates with the
retirement board and until the time the retirement board determines the validity of the service credit.
(j) A member who knowingly makes a false statement to the retirement board regarding
service time or credit shall not be entitled to a retirement allowance and is entitled only to the return
of his or her contributions without interest.
SECTION 2. Section 36-10-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-10 entitled "Retirement
System — Contributions and Benefits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-10-9. Retirement on service allowance — In general.
Retirement of a member on a service retirement allowance shall be made by the retirement
board as follows:
(1)(a)(i) Any member may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board
as of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed; provided, the member
was separated from service prior thereto; and further provided, however, that if separation from
service occurs during the month in which application is filed, the effective date shall be the first
day following that separation from service; and provided further that the member on his or her
retirement date attained the age of sixty (60) and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory
service on or before July 1, 2005, or who, regardless of age, has completed twenty-eight (28) years
of total service and has completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July
1, 2005, and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.
(ii) For members who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009, and prior to
July 1, 2012, benefits are available to members who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and
completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For members in service as of October 1,
2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but become eligible to retire prior
to July 1, 2012, the minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62) will be adjusted downward in
proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September 30, 2009. The
proportional formula shall work as follows:
(1) The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in
effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of
sixty-two (62).
(2) The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009,
as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (1) as the denominator.
(3) The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined
LC003366 - Page 6 of 15

in (1) to apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).
(b)(i) Any member, who has not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service
on or before July 1, 2005, may retire upon his or her written application to the retirement board as
of the first day of the calendar month in which the application was filed; provided, the member was
separated from service prior thereto; and further provided, however, that if separation from service
occurs during the month in which application is filed, the effective date shall be the first day
following that separation from service; provided, the member or his or her retirement date had
attained the age of fifty-nine (59) and had completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service
or provided that the member on his or her retirement date had attained the age of sixty-five (65)
and had completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service; or provided, that the member on
his or her retirement date had attained the age of fifty-five (55) and had completed twenty (20)
years of total service provided, that the retirement allowance, as determined according to the
formula in § 36-10-10 is reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is less than
sixty-five (65) years, and who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September
30, 2009.
(ii) For members who become eligible to retire on or after October 1, 2009 and prior to
July 1, 2012, benefits are available to members who have attained the age of sixty-two (62) and
completed at least twenty-nine (29) years of total service or have attained the age of sixty-five (65)
and completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service. For members in service as of October
1, 2009, who were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, but become eligible to retire prior
to July 1, 2012, who have a minimum retirement age of sixty-two (62), the retirement age will be
adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service the member has earned as of September
30, 2009. The proportional formula shall work as follows:
(1) The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in
effect on September 30, 2009, which shall then be subtracted from the minimum retirement age of
sixty-two (62).
(2) The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of September 30, 2009,
as the numerator and the years of service credit determined under (1) as the denominator.
(3) The fraction determined in (2) above shall then be multiplied by the age difference
determined in (1) to apply a reduction in years from age sixty-two (62).
(c) Effective July 1, 2012, the following shall apply to all members not eligible to retire
prior to July 1, 2012:
(i) A member with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, shall be eligible to retire
upon the completion of at least five (5) years of contributory service and attainment of the member’s
LC003366 - Page 7 of 15

Social Security retirement age.
(ii) For members with five (5) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012,
with contributory service on and after July 1, 2012, who have a retirement age of Social Security
Retirement Age, the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of
service the member has earned as of June 30, 2012, but in no event shall a member’s retirement
age under this subparagraph (ii) be prior to the attainment of age fifty-nine (59) or prior to the
member’s retirement age determined under the laws in effect on June 30, 2012. The proportional
formula shall work as follows:
(1) The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in
effect on June 30, 2012, which shall then be subtracted from Social Security retirement age;
(2) The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of June 30, 2012, as
the numerator and the projected service at retirement age in effect on June 30, 2012, as the
denominator;
(3) The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined
in (1) to apply a reduction in years from Social Security retirement age.
(iii) Effective July 1, 2015, a member who has completed twenty (20) or more years of
total service and who has attained an age within five (5) years of the eligible retirement age under
subparagraphs (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below, may elect to retire provided that the
retirement allowance shall be reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is less
than the eligible retirement age under subparagraphs (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above or subsection (d) below
in accordance with the following table:
Year Preceding Retirement Cumulative Annual Reduction Cumulative Monthly
Reduction
For Year 1 9% .75%
For Year 2 8% .667%
For Year 3 7% .583%
For Year 4 7% .583%
For Year 5 7% .583%
(iv) Notwithstanding any other provisions of section 36-10-9(c), a member who has
completed ten (10) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012, may elect to retire at
his or her eligible retirement date as determined under paragraphs (1)(a) and (1)(b) above provided
that a member making an election under this paragraph shall receive the member’s retirement
benefit determined and calculated based on the member’s service and average compensation as of
June 30, 2012. This provision shall be interpreted and administered in a manner to protect a
LC003366 - Page 8 of 15

member’s accrued benefit on June 30, 2012.
(d)(i) Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (c) above, effective July 1, 2015,
members in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the earlier of: (A) The attainment of at
least age sixty-five (65) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years of total service, or the
attainment of at least age sixty-four (64) and the completion of at least thirty-one (31) years of total
service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-three (63) and the completion of at least thirty-two
(32) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-two (62) and the completion of at
least thirty-three (33) years of total service; or (B) The member’s retirement eligibility date under
subsections (c)(i) or (c)(ii) above.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (c) or subsection (d)(i) of this
section, commencing July 1, 2026, teachers in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the
earlier of:
(A) The attainment of at least age sixty (60) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years
of total service; or
(B) The teacher's retirement eligibility date under subsections (c)(i) or (c)(ii) of this section.
(2) Any faculty employee at a public institution of higher education under the jurisdiction
of the council on postsecondary education shall not be involuntarily retired upon attaining the age
of seventy (70) years.
(3)(i) Except as specifically provided in § 36-10-9.1, §§ 36-10-12 — 36-10-15, and §§ 45-
21-19 — 45-21-22, (I) On or prior to June 30, 2012 no member shall be eligible for pension benefits
under this chapter unless the member shall have been a contributing member of the employee’s
retirement system for at least ten (10) years, or (II) For members in active contributory service on
or after July 1, 2012, the member shall have been a contributing member of the retirement system
for at least five (5) years.
(ii) Provided, however, a person who has ten (10) years service credit on or before June 16,
1991, shall be vested.
(iii) Furthermore, any past service credits purchased in accordance with § 36-9-38 shall be
counted towards vesting.
(iv) Any person who becomes a member of the employees’ retirement system pursuant to
§ 45-21-4 shall be considered a contributing member for the purpose of chapter 21 of title 45 and
this chapter.
(v) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no more than five (5) years of service
credit may be purchased by a member of the system. The five (5) year limit shall not apply to any
purchases made prior to January 1, 1995. A member who has purchased more than five (5) years
LC003366 - Page 9 of 15

of service credits before January 1, 1995, shall be permitted to apply those purchases towards the
member’s service retirement. However, no further purchase will be permitted. Repayment in
accordance with applicable law and regulation of any contribution previously withdrawn from the
system shall not be deemed a purchase of service credit.
(vi) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, effective July 1, 2012, except for
purchases under §§ 16-16-7.1, 36-5-3, 36-9-31, 36-10-10.4, and 45-21-53, (A) For service
purchases for time periods prior to a member’s initial date of hire, the purchase must be made
within three (3) years of the member’s initial date of hire, (B) For service purchases for time periods
for official periods of leave as authorized by law, the purchase must be made within three (3) years
of the time the official leave was concluded by the member. Notwithstanding the preceding
sentence, service purchases from time periods prior to June 30, 2012, may be made on or prior to
June 30, 2015.
(4) No member of the employees’ retirement system shall be permitted to purchase service
credits for casual, seasonal, or temporary employment, or emergency appointment, for employment
as a page in the general assembly, or for employment at any state college or university while the
employee is a student or graduate assistant of the college or university.
(5) Except as specifically provided in §§ 16-16-6.2 and 16-16-6.4, a member shall not
receive service credit in this retirement system for any year or portion of it, which counts as service
credit in any other retirement system in which the member is vested or from which the member is
receiving a pension and/or any annual payment for life. This subsection shall not apply to any
payments received pursuant to the federal Social Security Act or to payments from a military
pension earned prior to participation in state or municipal employment, or to military service credits
earned prior to participation in state or municipal employment.
(6) A member who seeks to purchase or receive service credit in this retirement system
shall have the affirmative duty to disclose to the retirement board whether or not he or she is a
vested member in any other retirement system and/or is receiving a pension, retirement allowance,
or any annual payment for life. The retirement board shall have the right to investigate as to whether
or not the member has utilized the same time of service for credit in any other retirement system.
The member has an affirmative duty to cooperate with the retirement board including, by way of
illustration and not by way of limitations the duty to furnish or have furnished to the retirement
board any relevant information which is protected by any privacy act.
(7) A member who fails to cooperate with the retirement board shall not have the time of
service counted toward total service credit until such time as the member cooperates with the
retirement board and until such time as the retirement board determines the validity of the service
LC003366 - Page 10 of 15

credit.
(8) A member who knowingly makes a false statement to the retirement board regarding
service time or credit shall not be entitled to a retirement allowance and is entitled only to the return
of his or her contributions without interest.
SECTION 3. Section 45-21-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21 entitled "Retirement
of Municipal Employees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21-16. Retirement on service allowance.
Retirement of a member on a service retirement allowance shall be made by the retirement
board as follows:
(1)(i) Any member who is eligible to retire on or before June 30, 2012, may retire upon the
member’s written application to the retirement board as of the first day of the calendar month in
which the application was filed, provided the member was separated from service prior to the
application, and provided, further, that if separation from service occurs during the month in which
application is filed, the effective date is the first day following the separation from service, provided
that the member at the time so specified for the member’s retirement has attained the applicable
minimum retirement age and has completed at least ten (10) years of total service or who, regardless
of age, completed thirty (30) years of total service, and notwithstanding that during the period of
notification the member has separated from service. The minimum ages for service retirement
(except for employees completing thirty (30) years of service) is fifty-eight (58) years.
(ii) Effective July 1, 2012, the following shall apply to all members not eligible to retire
prior to July 1, 2012:
(A) A member with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, shall be eligible to retire
upon the completion of at least five (5) years of contributory service and attainment of the member’s
Social Security retirement age.
(B) For members with five (5) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012,
with contributory service on and after July 1, 2012, who have a retirement age of Social Security
retirement age, the retirement age will be adjusted downward in proportion to the amount of service
the member has earned as of June 30, 2012, but in no event shall a member’s retirement age under
this subparagraph (B) be prior to the attainment of age fifty-nine (59) or prior to the member’s
retirement age determined under the laws in effect on June 30, 2012. The proportional formula shall
work as follows:
(1) The formula shall determine the first age of retirement eligibility under the laws in
effect on June 30, 2012, which shall then be subtracted from Social Security retirement age;
(2) The formula shall then take the member’s total service credit as of June 30, 2012, as
LC003366 - Page 11 of 15

the numerator and the projected service at retirement age in effect on June 30, 2012, as the
denominator;
(3) The fraction determined in (2) shall then be multiplied by the age difference determined
in (1) to apply a reduction in years from Social Security retirement age.
(C) Effective July 1, 2015, a member who has completed twenty (20) or more years of total
service and who has attained an age within five (5) years of the eligible retirement age under
subparagraphs (ii)(A) or (ii)(B) above or subsection (iii) below, may elect to retire provided that
the retirement allowance shall be reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is
less than the eligible retirement age under subparagraphs (ii)(A) or (ii)(B) above or subsection (iii)
below in accordance with the following table:
Year Preceding Retirement Cumulative Annual Reduction Cumulative Monthly
Reduction
For Year 1 9% .75%
For Year 2 8% .667%
For Year 3 7% .583%
For Year 4 7% .583%
For Year 5 7% .583%
(D)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of § 42-21-16(1)(ii), a member who has
completed ten (10) or more years of contributory service as of June 30, 2012, may elect to retire at
his or her eligible retirement date as determined under paragraph (i) above provided that a member
making an election under this paragraph shall receive the member’s retirement benefit determined
and calculated based on the member’s service and average compensation as of June 30, 2012. This
provision shall be interpreted and administered in a manner to protect a member’s accrued benefit
on June 30, 2012.
(iii)(A) Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (ii) above, effective July 1,
2015, members in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the earlier of: (I) The attainment of
at least age sixty-five (65) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years of total service, or the
attainment of at least age sixty-four (64) and the completion of at least thirty-one (31) years of total
service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-three (63) and the completion of at least thirty-two
(32) years of total service, or the attainment of at least age sixty-two (62) and the completion of at
least thirty-three (33) years of total service; or (II) The member’s retirement eligibility date under
subsections (ii)(A) or (ii)(B) above.
(B) Notwithstanding any other provisions of subsection (ii) or subsection (iii)(A) above,
commencing July 1, 2026, members in active service shall be eligible to retire upon the earlier of:
LC003366 - Page 12 of 15

(I) The attainment of least age sixty (60) and the completion of at least thirty (30) years of
total service; or
(II) The member's retirement eligibility date under subsections (ii)(A) or (ii)(B) of this
section.
(2) Except as specifically provided in §§ 45-21-19 — 45-21-22, no member is eligible for
pension benefits under this chapter unless:
(I) On or prior to June 30, 2012, the member has been a contributing member of the
employees’ retirement system for at least ten (10) years; or
(II) For members in active contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, the member shall
have been a contributing member of the employees’ retirement system for at least five (5) years.
(i) Provided, however, a person who has ten (10) years service credit on or before June 16,
1991, is vested.
(ii) Furthermore, any past service credits purchased in accordance with § 45-21-62 are
counted towards vesting.
(iii) Any person who becomes a member of the employees’ retirement system pursuant to
§ 45-21-4 shall be considered a contributing member for the purpose of this chapter.
(iv) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no more than five (5) years of service
credit may be purchased by a member of the System. The five (5)-year limit does not apply to any
purchases made prior to the effective date of this provision. A member who has purchased more
than five (5) years of service credit maximum, before January 1, 1995, shall be permitted to apply
the purchases towards the member’s service retirement. However, no further purchase will be
permitted. Repayment, in accordance with applicable law and regulation, of any contribution
previously withdrawn from the System is not deemed a purchase of service credit.
(v) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, effective July 1, 2012, except for purchases
under §§ 16-16-7.1, 36-5-3, 36-9-31, 36-10-10.4, and 45-21-53:
(I) For service purchases for time periods prior to a member’s initial date of hire; the
purchase must be made within three (3) years of the member’s initial date of hire; and
(II) For service purchases for time periods for official periods of leave as authorized by
law, the purchase must be made within three (3) years of the time the official leave was concluded
by the member.
Notwithstanding (I) and (II) above, service purchases from time periods prior to June 30,
2012, may be made on or prior to June 30, 2015.
(3) No member of the municipal employees’ retirement system is permitted to purchase
service credits for casual, temporary, emergency or seasonal employment, for employment as a
LC003366 - Page 13 of 15

page in the general assembly, or for employment at any state college or university while the
employee is a student or graduate assistant of the college or university.
(4) A member does not receive service credit in this retirement system for any year or
portion of a year, which counts as service credit in any other retirement system in which the member
is vested or from which the member is receiving a pension and/or any annual payment for life. This
subsection does not apply to any payments received pursuant to the federal Social Security Act or
to payments from a military pension earned prior to participation in state or municipal employment,
or to military service credits earned prior to participation in state or municipal employment.
(5) A member who seeks to purchase or receive service credit in this retirement system has
the affirmative duty to disclose to the retirement board whether or not he or she is a vested member
in any other retirement system and/or is receiving a pension retirement allowance or any annual
payment for life. The retirement board has the right to investigate whether or not the member has
utilized the same time of service for credit in any other retirement system. The member has an
affirmative duty to cooperate with the retirement board including, by way of illustration and not by
way of limitation, the duty to furnish or have furnished to the retirement board any relevant
information which is protected by any privacy act.
(6) A member who fails to cooperate with the retirement board shall not have the time of
service counted toward total service credit until a time that the member cooperates with the
retirement board and until a time that the retirement board determines the validity of the service
credit.
(7) A member who knowingly makes a false statement to the retirement board regarding
service time or credit is not entitled to a retirement allowance and is entitled only to the return of
his or her contributions without interest.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003366
========
LC003366 - Page 14 of 15